Tennessee, session 114, HB0175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 70, Chapter 4, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The commission is authorized to promulgate rules, in accordance with the
Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and pass
proclamations regarding the utilization of unmanned aircraft, including drones, solely for
the purpose of locating and recovering a deer that has been wounded or is reasonably
believed to have been wounded while a person is lawfully engaged in hunting.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0175
001101
- 1 -